Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2678.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin HOUSING AFFORDABILITY FUND; FISCAL YEARS 2026 AND 2027 ALLOCATION.new text end new text begin (a) At least 25 percent of the allocations from the Housing Finance Agency's housing affordability fund, or Pool 3, in fiscal years 2026 and 2027 shall be for distribution to the workforce and affordable homeownership development program under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.38. This amount shall not be used for loans or other financing programs. No money from the allocation under this paragraph may be used to administer this program. new text end new text begin (b) By June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, the commissioner of the Housing Finance Agency shall report to the legislature the following for the allocation of housing affordability funds under paragraph (a) for: new text end new text begin (1) the number and amount of grants issued for single-family homes, townhomes, and manufactured homes; new text end new text begin (2) the number and amount of grants issued by income categories; and new text end new text begin (3) the number and amount of grants issued by county. new text end new text begin (c) Nothing in this section shall impair the agency from using funds in Pool 3 to satisfy its obligations to holders of bonds secured by the general obligation pledge of the agency. new text end